District of Columbia statutes.
24-306

Psychiatric services.

The Mayor shall appoint a qualified psychiatrist and a qualified psychologist whose services shall be available to the following officers to assist them in carrying out their duties:

(1)

In criminal cases, the judges and probation officers of the United States District Court for the District of Columbia and the judges and Director of Social Services of the Superior Court of the District of Columbia;

(2)

The judges and such personnel assigned to the Family Division of the Superior Court as the Chief Judge may designate;

(3)

Such officers of the Department of Corrections as the Director thereof shall designate; and

(4)

The Board of Parole of the District.

History

June 29, 1953, 67 Stat. 105, ch. 159, § 405
Aug. 16, 1954, 68 Stat. 730, ch. 737, § 1
July 8, 1963, 77 Stat. 77, Pub. L. 88-60, § 1
July 29, 1970, 84 Stat. 577, Pub. L. 91-358, title I, § 159(d)
June 3, 1997, D.C. Law 11-275, § 15, 44 DCR 1408

Cross References

Board of Parole, creation, powers and duties, see §§ 24-401.01 to 24-401.03.
Confinement in mental hospital while in penal institution, see § 24-502.
Department of Corrections, see §§ 24-211.011 to 24-211.06.
Investigations and reports by probation officers, see § 24-303.
Physical and mental examinations and treatment of child, see § 16-2315.

Section References

This section is referenced in § 24-502.

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 24-106.
1973 Ed., § 24-106.

Change in Government

This section originated at a time when local government powers were delegated to a Board of Commissioners of the District of Columbia (see Acts Relating to the Establishment of the District of Columbia and its Various Forms of Governmental Organization in Volume 1). Section 401 of Reorganization Plan No. 3 of 1967 (see Reorganization Plans in Volume 1) transferred all of the functions of the Board of Commissioners under this section to a single Commissioner. The District of Columbia Self-Government and Governmental Reorganization Act, 87 Stat. 818, § 711 ( D.C. Code, § 1-207.11), abolished the District of Columbia Council and the Office of Commissioner of the District of Columbia. These branches of government were replaced by the Council of the District of Columbia and the Office of Mayor of the District of Columbia, respectively. Accordingly, and also pursuant to § 714(a) of such Act ( D.C. Code, § 1-207.14(a)), appropriate changes in terminology were made in this section.